Utah statutes.
58-17b-603.   Identification of pharmacy personnel.
(1)  All individuals employed in a pharmacy facility having any contact with
the public or patients receiving services from that pharmacy facility shall
wear on their person a clearly visible and readable identification showing the
individual's name and position.
(2)  When communicating by any means, written, verbal, or electronic, pharmacy
personnel must identify themselves as to licensure classification.
